District of Columbia statutes.
37-102

Coordinated management.

(a)

The Department of General Services shall supervise and provide coordinated management over all operations in the Eastern Market Square. On April 16, 1999, the District of Columbia shall notify any extant lessees and sub-assignees with an existing lease, contract, agreement or legally binding understanding with respect to any occupant or occupants of the Eastern Market building of the status of their lease or agreement, including the date of termination or expiration of their lease or sub-assignment or any other change to an agreement or legally binding understanding with the District of Columbia that is required by this chapter. The District of Columbia shall remain responsible for capital expenditures for Eastern Market and the Eastern Market Square.

(b)

The CPMO may promulgate rules to implement this chapter.

Apr. 16, 1999, D.C. Law 12-228, § 3, 46 DCR 1066
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 91(b), 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 10-302.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services” for “OPM” in the first sentence of (a).